Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB342.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Family and Medical Leave Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Eligible employee." As defined in 29 U.S.C. § 2611 (relating to definitions)."Employer." An employer in this Commonwealth that is subject to 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28 (relating to family and medical leave)."Grandchild." A biological or adoptive grandson or 1234567891011121314151617 granddaughter or stepgrandson or stepgranddaughter."Grandparent." A biological or adoptive grandfather or grandmother or stepgrandfather or stepgrandmother."Sibling." A biological or adoptive brother or sister or stepbrother or stepsister.Section 3. Eligibility.(a) Leave.--An employer shall provide up to six weeks of the same unpaid leave to an eligible employee to which the eligible employee is entitled under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28 (relating to family and medical leave) to care for a spouse, son, daughter or parent, but only to care for the eligible employee's sibling, grandparent or grandchild, if the sibling, grandparent or grandchild:(1) does not have a living spouse, child over 17 years of age or parent under 65 years of age; and(2) has a certified terminal illness.(b) Protections.--An eligible employee who takes leave provided under subsection (a) is entitled to the same protections and rights that an eligible employee is entitled to under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28.(c) Amount of leave.--(1) The amount of leave taken by an eligible employee under this section shall not exceed six weeks during a 12-month period. The 12-month period shall be determined in the same manner that the employer determines the 12-month period for leave under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28.(2) Leave must be taken in a minimum of one-week increments.(3) Leave taken by an eligible employee under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28 shall reduce an employee's leave entitlement in any 20250SB0342PN0279 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable 12-month period under this section, provided that leave taken by an employee in accordance with this section shall not reduce the employee's leave entitlement under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28.(d) Employee notice of leave.--An employee shall provide written or verbal notice of the need to take leave under this section to the employer as soon as practicable.(e) Medical certification.--(1) An employer may require certification from a physician to verify terminal illness of an employee providing notice of the need to take leave under this section.(2) The department shall develop a form that may be used to provide medical certification under this subsection.(f) Employer posting.--An employer shall post and maintain in a conspicuous place a printed abstract, developed by the department, of the provisions of this act.Section 4. Complaints.An employee may file a complaint with the department on a form prescribed by the department if the employee:(1) is denied leave;(2) believes that the employee is entitled to that leave; and(3) believes that the employer has violated section 3(b).Section 5. Administration.The department shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Provide the abstract for employer posting under section 3(f) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Provide the medical certification form under section 20250SB0342PN0279 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3(e)(2) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Provide the employee complaint form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) Develop procedures to investigate and resolve complaints.(5) Promulgate regulations as necessary to administer this act.Section 6. Funding.The department shall not be required to enforce this act until adequate funding is appropriated. The Secretary of Labor and Industry shall determine if adequate funding is appropriated. Upon the appropriation of adequate funding, the Secretary of Labor and Industry shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0342PN0279 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718